Tennessee statutes. Title 65 Public Utilities and Carriers
Part 1

Powers, Construction, Maintenance [Repealed]

65-16-101— 65-16-121. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 16, part 1, §§ 65-16-101 — 65-16-121 (Acts 1875, ch 142, § 13; 1887, ch. 15, § 1, ch. 189, § 1; 1889, ch. 149, § 1; 1891, ch. 9, § 1; 1894, ch. 29, §§ 1, 3; 1898 (E.S.), ch. 8, § 1; 1901, ch. 166, § 1; 1903, ch. 321, §§ 1, 2, ch. 406 §§ 1, 2; 1907, ch. 433, §§ 1-4, ch. 446, § 1; 1909, ch. 352, § 1, ch. 392, §§ 1-3, ch. 563, § 1; 1917, ch. 69, §§ 1, 2; 1929, ch. 76, §§ 1-3; Shan., §§ 1536, 1880a13, 2393, 2395, 2395a1 — 2395a3, 2399 — 2402, 2404, 2405, 2407 — 2409, 2411, 2411a1, 2411a3 — 2411a5, 2411a7 — 2411a12, 2411a15, 2411a17, 2411a18; Shan. Supp., §§ 2411a19, 2411a20; Code 1932, §§ 3158, 4014, 4016 — 4019, 4021 — 4026, 4028 — 4033, 4037 — 4046, 4049 — 4053; Acts 1943, ch. 51, § 1, ch. 52, § 1; 1945, ch. 97, § 1; 1949, ch 276, § 1; C. Supp., 1950, § 5447.1; Acts 1953, ch. 58, § 1; 1955, ch. 69, § 1; 1976, ch. 823, §§ 2, 4; 1978, ch. 934, § 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 65-1601 — 65-1605, 65-1609 — 65-1624, 65-1626 — 65-1638, 65-1701 — 65-1703; Acts 1995, ch. 305, §§ 33), concerning street and interurban railroads, powers, construction and maintenance, was repealed by Acts 2003, ch. 19, § 2, effective April 11, 2003.